Utah statutes.
34A-8a-201.   Chapter administration.
The commission shall administer this chapter:
(1)  through the division; and
(2)  in conjunction with the commission's administration of Chapter 2,
Workers' Compensation Act, and Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act.
